isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX DZ Y 81
SFX DZ  se 0 .
SFX DZ ti se l .
SFX DZ ti se la .
SFX DZ ti se lo .
SFX DZ ti se li .
SFX DZ ati se u .
SFX DZ ati se em .
SFX DZ ati se eš .
SFX DZ ati se e .
SFX DZ ati se emo .
SFX DZ ati se ete .
SFX DZ ati se ut .
SFX DZ ti se h .
SFX DZ ti se še .
SFX DZ ti se hmo .
SFX DZ ti se ste .
SFX DZ ti se hu .
SFX DZ ati se 0 .
SFX DZ ati se mo .
SFX DZ ati se te .
SFX DZ ati se uči .
SFX DZ ati se učego .
SFX DZ ati se učemu .
SFX DZ ati se učim .
SFX DZ ati se učem .
SFX DZ ati se učih .
SFX DZ ati se učimi .
SFX DZ ati se uča .
SFX DZ ati se uču .
SFX DZ ati se učej .
SFX DZ ati se učeju .
SFX DZ ati se uče .
SFX DZ ati se emy .
SFX DZ ati se emogo .
SFX DZ ati se emomu .
SFX DZ ati se emym .
SFX DZ ati se emom .
SFX DZ ati se emo .
SFX DZ ati se ema .
SFX DZ ati se emu .
SFX DZ ati se emoj .
SFX DZ ati se emoju .
SFX DZ ati se emi .
SFX DZ ati se eme .
SFX DZ ati se emyh .
SFX DZ ati se emym .
SFX DZ ati se emymi .
SFX DZ ti se vši .
SFX DZ ti se všego .
SFX DZ ti se všemu .
SFX DZ ti se všim .
SFX DZ ti se všem .
SFX DZ ti se vših .
SFX DZ ti se všimi .
SFX DZ ti se vša .
SFX DZ ti se všu .
SFX DZ ti se všej .
SFX DZ ti se všeju .
SFX DZ ti se vše .
SFX DZ ti se ny .
SFX DZ ti se nogo .
SFX DZ ti se nomu .
SFX DZ ti se nym .
SFX DZ ti se nom .
SFX DZ ti se ni .
SFX DZ ti se ne .
SFX DZ ti se nyh .
SFX DZ ti se nymi .
SFX DZ ti se na .
SFX DZ ti se nu .
SFX DZ ti se noj .
SFX DZ ti se noju .
SFX DZ ti se no .
SFX DZ ti se nje .
SFX DZ ti se nja .
SFX DZ ti se nju .
SFX DZ ti se njem .
SFX DZ ti se nij .
SFX DZ ti se njam .
SFX DZ ti se njami .
SFX DZ ti se njah .

SFX Da Y 10
SFX Da 0 na .
SFX Da 0 ne .
SFX Da 0 n .
SFX Da 0 ni .
SFX Da 0 nu .
SFX Da 0 nah .
SFX Da 0 nam .
SFX Da 0 nem .
SFX Da 0 nom .
SFX Da 0 nami .

SFX Db Y 4
SFX Db sot isot .
SFX Db sot istah .
SFX Db sot istam .
SFX Db sot justami .

SFX Dc Y 9
SFX Dc es si .
SFX Dc es sa .
SFX Dc es sov .
SFX Dc es su .
SFX Dc es sah .
SFX Dc es sam .
SFX Dc es som .
SFX Dc es sami .
SFX Dc es se .

SFX Dd Y 9
SFX Dd i je .
SFX Dd i ju .
SFX Dd i ej .
SFX Dd i ji .
SFX Dd i jah .
SFX Dd i jam .
SFX Dd i jeju .
SFX Dd i jami .
SFX Dd i jo .

SFX De Y 68
SFX De ti l .
SFX De ti la .
SFX De ti lo .
SFX De ti li .
SFX De ypěti ipju .
SFX De ypěti ipim .
SFX De ypěti ipiš .
SFX De ypěti ipi .
SFX De ypěti ipimo .
SFX De ypěti ipite .
SFX De ypěti ipet .
SFX De ti h .
SFX De ti še .
SFX De ti hmo .
SFX De ti ste .
SFX De ti hu .
SFX De ypěti ipeči .
SFX De ypěti ipeča .
SFX De ypěti ipeče .
SFX De ypěti ipimy .
SFX De ypěti ipimogo .
SFX De ypěti ipimomu .
SFX De ypěti ipimym .
SFX De ypěti ipimom .
SFX De ypěti ipimo .
SFX De ypěti ipima .
SFX De ypěti ipimu .
SFX De ypěti ipimoj .
SFX De ypěti ipimoju .
SFX De ypěti ipimi .
SFX De ypěti ipime .
SFX De ypěti ipimyh .
SFX De ypěti ipimym .
SFX De ypěti ipimymi .
SFX De ti vši .
SFX De ti všego .
SFX De ti všemu .
SFX De ti všim .
SFX De ti všem .
SFX De ti vših .
SFX De ti všimi .
SFX De ti vša .
SFX De ti všu .
SFX De ti všej .
SFX De ti všeju .
SFX De ti vše .
SFX De ti ny .
SFX De ti nogo .
SFX De ti nomu .
SFX De ti nym .
SFX De ti nom .
SFX De ti ni .
SFX De ti ne .
SFX De ti nyh .
SFX De ti nymi .
SFX De ti na .
SFX De ti nu .
SFX De ti noj .
SFX De ti noju .
SFX De ti no .
SFX De ti nje .
SFX De ti nja .
SFX De ti nju .
SFX De ti njem .
SFX De ti nij .
SFX De ti njam .
SFX De ti njami .
SFX De ti njah .

SFX Df Y 11
SFX Df 0 e .
SFX Df 0 i .
SFX Df 0 a .
SFX Df 0 ev .
SFX Df 0 ij .
SFX Df 0 u .
SFX Df 0 ah .
SFX Df 0 am .
SFX Df 0 em .
SFX Df 0 ju .
SFX Df 0 ami .

SFX Dg Y 9
SFX Dg oha hy .
SFX Dg oha hu .
SFX Dg oha h .
SFX Dg oha hě .
SFX Dg oha hah .
SFX Dg oha ham .
SFX Dg oha hoju .
SFX Dg oha hami .
SFX Dg oha ho .

SFX Dh Y 9
SFX Dh o a .
SFX Dh no on .
SFX Dh o u .
SFX Dh o ah .
SFX Dh o am .
SFX Dh 0 m .
SFX Dh o ami .
SFX Dh no en .
SFX Dh o ju .

SFX Di Y 19
SFX Di ob b .
SFX Di ob by .
SFX Di 0 y .
SFX Di ob ba .
SFX Di 0 a .
SFX Di ob bov .
SFX Di 0 ov .
SFX Di ob bu .
SFX Di 0 u .
SFX Di ob bah .
SFX Di 0 ah .
SFX Di ob bam .
SFX Di 0 am .
SFX Di ob bom .
SFX Di 0 om .
SFX Di ob bami .
SFX Di 0 ami .
SFX Di ob be .
SFX Di 0 e .

SFX Dj Y 4
SFX Dj i ov .
SFX Dj i ah .
SFX Dj i am .
SFX Dj i ami .

SFX Dk Y 80
SFX Dk ti l .
SFX Dk ti la .
SFX Dk ti lo .
SFX Dk ti li .
SFX Dk vati ju .
SFX Dk vati jem .
SFX Dk vati ješ .
SFX Dk vati je .
SFX Dk vati jemo .
SFX Dk vati jete .
SFX Dk vati jut .
SFX Dk ti h .
SFX Dk ti še .
SFX Dk ti hmo .
SFX Dk ti ste .
SFX Dk ti hu .
SFX Dk vati j .
SFX Dk vati jmo .
SFX Dk vati jte .
SFX Dk vati juči .
SFX Dk vati jučego .
SFX Dk vati jučemu .
SFX Dk vati jučim .
SFX Dk vati jučem .
SFX Dk vati jučih .
SFX Dk vati jučimi .
SFX Dk vati juča .
SFX Dk vati juču .
SFX Dk vati jučej .
SFX Dk vati jučeju .
SFX Dk vati juče .
SFX Dk vati jemy .
SFX Dk vati jemogo .
SFX Dk vati jemomu .
SFX Dk vati jemym .
SFX Dk vati jemom .
SFX Dk vati jemo .
SFX Dk vati jema .
SFX Dk vati jemu .
SFX Dk vati jemoj .
SFX Dk vati jemoju .
SFX Dk vati jemi .
SFX Dk vati jeme .
SFX Dk vati jemyh .
SFX Dk vati jemym .
SFX Dk vati jemymi .
SFX Dk ti vši .
SFX Dk ti všego .
SFX Dk ti všemu .
SFX Dk ti všim .
SFX Dk ti všem .
SFX Dk ti vših .
SFX Dk ti všimi .
SFX Dk ti vša .
SFX Dk ti všu .
SFX Dk ti všej .
SFX Dk ti všeju .
SFX Dk ti vše .
SFX Dk ti ny .
SFX Dk ti nogo .
SFX Dk ti nomu .
SFX Dk ti nym .
SFX Dk ti nom .
SFX Dk ti ni .
SFX Dk ti ne .
SFX Dk ti nyh .
SFX Dk ti nymi .
SFX Dk ti na .
SFX Dk ti nu .
SFX Dk ti noj .
SFX Dk ti noju .
SFX Dk ti no .
SFX Dk ti nje .
SFX Dk ti nja .
SFX Dk ti nju .
SFX Dk ti njem .
SFX Dk ti nij .
SFX Dk ti njam .
SFX Dk ti njami .
SFX Dk ti njah .

SFX Dl Y 27
SFX Dl y o .
SFX Dl y a .
SFX Dl y ogo .
SFX Dl y u .
SFX Dl y oj .
SFX Dl y om .
SFX Dl y omu .
SFX Dl 0 m .
SFX Dl y oju .
SFX Dl y i .
SFX Dl y e .
SFX Dl 0 h .
SFX Dl 0 mi .
SFX Dl ky ši/zz .
SFX Dl ky šego .
SFX Dl ky šemu .
SFX Dl ky šim .
SFX Dl ky šem .
SFX Dl ky še .
SFX Dl ky ša .
SFX Dl ky šu .
SFX Dl ky šej .
SFX Dl ky šeju .
SFX Dl ky ših .
SFX Dl ky šim .
SFX Dl ky šimi .
SFX Dl tky če .

SFX Dm Y 9
SFX Dm ev jvi .
SFX Dm ev jva .
SFX Dm ev jvov .
SFX Dm ev jvu .
SFX Dm ev jvah .
SFX Dm ev jvam .
SFX Dm ev jvom .
SFX Dm ev jvami .
SFX Dm ev jve .

SFX Dn Y 80
SFX Dn ti l .
SFX Dn ti la .
SFX Dn ti lo .
SFX Dn ti li .
SFX Dn gati žu .
SFX Dn gati žem .
SFX Dn gati žeš .
SFX Dn gati že .
SFX Dn gati žemo .
SFX Dn gati žete .
SFX Dn gati žut .
SFX Dn ti h .
SFX Dn ti še .
SFX Dn ti hmo .
SFX Dn ti ste .
SFX Dn ti hu .
SFX Dn gati ži .
SFX Dn gati žimo .
SFX Dn gati žite .
SFX Dn gati žuči .
SFX Dn gati žučego .
SFX Dn gati žučemu .
SFX Dn gati žučim .
SFX Dn gati žučem .
SFX Dn gati žučih .
SFX Dn gati žučimi .
SFX Dn gati žuča .
SFX Dn gati žuču .
SFX Dn gati žučej .
SFX Dn gati žučeju .
SFX Dn gati žuče .
SFX Dn gati žemy .
SFX Dn gati žemogo .
SFX Dn gati žemomu .
SFX Dn gati žemym .
SFX Dn gati žemom .
SFX Dn gati žemo .
SFX Dn gati žema .
SFX Dn gati žemu .
SFX Dn gati žemoj .
SFX Dn gati žemoju .
SFX Dn gati žemi .
SFX Dn gati žeme .
SFX Dn gati žemyh .
SFX Dn gati žemym .
SFX Dn gati žemymi .
SFX Dn ti vši .
SFX Dn ti všego .
SFX Dn ti všemu .
SFX Dn ti všim .
SFX Dn ti všem .
SFX Dn ti vših .
SFX Dn ti všimi .
SFX Dn ti vša .
SFX Dn ti všu .
SFX Dn ti všej .
SFX Dn ti všeju .
SFX Dn ti vše .
SFX Dn ti ny .
SFX Dn ti nogo .
SFX Dn ti nomu .
SFX Dn ti nym .
SFX Dn ti nom .
SFX Dn ti ni .
SFX Dn ti ne .
SFX Dn ti nyh .
SFX Dn ti nymi .
SFX Dn ti na .
SFX Dn ti nu .
SFX Dn ti noj .
SFX Dn ti noju .
SFX Dn ti no .
SFX Dn ti nje .
SFX Dn ti nja .
SFX Dn ti nju .
SFX Dn ti njem .
SFX Dn ti nij .
SFX Dn ti njam .
SFX Dn ti njami .
SFX Dn ti njah .
