isv_lat_hunspell_dict.dic
smějati se/DZ
zaime/Da
petsot/Db
vrěme/Da
pes/Dc
pani/Dd
kypěti/De
tyseč/Df
bloha/Dg
dno/Dh
lob/Di
groši/Dj
žuvati/Dk
kratky/Dl
lev/Dm
lgati/Dn
dějati se/DZ
blizneci/Dj
gusli/Dj
městoime/Da
prědki/Dj
prězime/Da
sěme/Da
klienti/Dj
starci/Dj
zname/Da
brěme/Da
ime/Da
rame/Da
pleme/Da
bogyni/Dd
nadějati se/DZ
slgati/Dn
vyme/Da
pisme/Da
suprugi/Dj
medžuvrěme/Da
blizneci/Dj
jasli/Dj
kroha/Dg
krotky/Dl
lev/Dm
odčajati se/DZ
prěžuvati/Dk
hvějati se/DZ
streme/Da
izlivati/Dk
